Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.51
Continuing education and training; evidence of
completion.

In each two-year period, every licensee shall complete twelve hours of approved continuing
education activities and six
hours of broker-approved training. Evidence of completion of such
continuing education and training activities
for the two-year period shall be submitted to the commission pursuant to rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

Laws 1985, LB 101, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 25;

Laws 2011, LB24, § 2.